District of Columbia statutes.
38-2021.07

[Omitted].

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of the Act of Aug. 7, 1946, ch. 779, § 7a, concerning required minimum distributions, see § 2(e) of the Retirement of Public-School Teachers Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-584, January 1, 2013, 60 DCR 134).